Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB381.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5561(b)(6) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5561. Nonapplicability of subchapter.* * *(b) Exemptions.--The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to the following:* * *(6) Conduct relating to animals actively involved in a bona fide scientific or medical research that is lawful under <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 the laws of the United States or this Commonwealth relating to activities undertaken by a research facility that is one of the following:* * *Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a chapter to read:SECTION 1. TITLE 35 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 58AANIMAL EXPERIMENTATION, SALEAND CERTAIN TESTING PROHIBITEDSubchapterA. ExperimentationB. SaleC. Certain Testing ProhibitedSUBCHAPTER AEXPERIMENTATIONSec.58A01. Definitions.58A02. Prohibiting Commonwealth funding for painful animal subject experimentation.58A03. Prohibiting Commonwealth funding for animal subject devocalization.58A03. COMPLIANCE WITH CRUELTY OF ANIMAL PROVISIONS FOR COMMONWEALTH FUNDING.58A04. Animal testing facilities and adoption of animal subjects.58A05. Disclosure requirements.58A06. Penalty.58A07. Annual report by State Treasurer.58A07. ANNUAL REPORTING ON COMMONWEALTH-FUNDED ANIMAL RESEARCH.20250SB0381PN1101 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 58A08. Annual report by recipients of Commonwealth funds.§ 58A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal subject." A dog or a cat."Animal testing facility." A facility, including a private entity, State agency or institution of higher education, that confines HOUSES and uses animal subjects for research, education, testing or other scientific or medical purposes."Commonwealth funds." Money of a fund or account in the State Treasury of the Commonwealth."Devocalization." The process of performing a surgical procedure to cut, notch, punch, abrade, laser, suture or otherwise physically alter the vocal apparatus of an animal subject with the intent of altering, reducing or eliminating vocal sounds produced by the animal subject."Devocalize." The term includes debarking, devoicing, silencing, ventriculocordectomy, vocal cordectomy, bark reduction and bark softening."INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION." A STATE-OWNED UNIVERSITY, COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR STATE-RELATED INSTITUTION."Medically unnecessary." Not carried out solely for the better health, welfare or safety of an animal subject."Recipient of Commonwealth funds." A person, including a public or private entity, to whom Commonwealth funds are paid."RELEASING AGENCY." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 901-A OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 7, 1982 (P.L.784, NO.225), KNOWN AS THE DOG LAW.§ 58A02. Prohibiting Commonwealth funding for painful animal subject experimentation.20250SB0381PN1101 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Use of funds.--A recipient of Commonwealth funds is prohibited from using the Commonwealth funds to directly support medically unnecessary research on animal subjects that is classified under pain and distress categories "D" or "E" by the United States Department of Agriculture.(b) Applicability.--Subsection (a) does not apply to the direct funding of research for the construction or maintenance of facilities, the purchase or maintenance of general-use equipment, overhead costs, capital improvements or faculty or employee salaries.§ 58A03. Prohibiting Commonwealth funding for animal subject devocalization.A recipient of Commonwealth funds is prohibited from using Commonwealth funds to devocalize an animal subject, to procure for use an animal subject that has undergone devocalization or to conduct research on animal subjects that have undergone devocalization.§ 58A03. COMPLIANCE WITH CRUELTY TO ANIMAL PROVISIONS FOR COMMONWEALTH FUNDING.AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY THAT RECEIVES COMMONWEALTH FUNDS SHALL COMPLY WITH 18 PA.C.S. CH. 55 SUBCH. B (RELATING TO CRUELTY TO ANIMALS).§ 58A04. Animal testing facilities and adoption of animal subjects.(a) Requirements.--An animal testing facility that receives Commonwealth funds and no longer has need of an animal subject in its possession shall, provided that doing so does not pose a risk to the health or safety of the public or the welfare of the animal subject:(1) offer the animal subject for release to a releasing 20250SB0381PN1101 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency for eventual adoption or for adoption through a private placement; or(2) if the testing facility is operated by an agency or institution of higher education, develop its own adoption program, provided that the program maintains records that comply with 3 Pa.C.S. § 2349 (relating to records and inspections).(b) Manner of release.--(1) The animal testing facility shall keep an offer for release open for a reasonable length of time for a duration of not less than 21 days, prior to euthanizing an animal subject.(2) The animal testing facility may enter into an agreement with a releasing agency for compliance with this section.(c) Immunity.--An animal testing facility shall not be liable for harm caused by or a defect suffered by an animal subject placed, in good faith, for adoption in compliance with this section.(A) REQUIREMENTS.--AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY THAT UTILIZES ANIMAL SUBJECTS FOR SCIENTIFIC, EDUCATIONAL OR RESEARCH PURPOSES AND RECEIVES COMMONWEALTH FUNDS FOR THOSE PURPOSES SHALL, AFTER THE COMPLETION OF TESTING OR RESEARCH INVOLVING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE EUTHANASIA OF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT UPON THE TERMINATION OF THE STUDY, AS DEFINED AND APPROVED BY THE RESEARCH OR TESTING PROTOCOL, ASSESS THE HEALTH OF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) IF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS DETERMINED TO BE SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION, THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL OFFER THE 20250SB0381PN1101 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ANIMAL SUBJECT FOR ADOPTION TO A RELEASING AGENCY FOR EVENTUAL ADOPTION OR THROUGH THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY'S ADOPTION PROGRAM TO A PRIVATE INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYEE FOR ADOPTION.(2) IF THE TESTING FACILITY OPERATES ITS OWN ADOPTION PROGRAM, IT MUST MAINTAIN RECORDS IN COMPLIANCE WITH 3 PA.C.S. § 2349 (RELATING TO RECORDS AND INSPECTIONS).(B) MANNER OF RELEASE.--(1) THE ATTENDING VETERINARIAN OR DESIGNEE AT AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL HAVE THE SOLE AUTHORITY TO ASSESS THE ANIMAL SUBJECT AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION.(2) PRIOR TO EUTHANIZING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT, THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL KEEP AN OFFER FOR RELEASE OPEN FOR A REASONABLE LENGTH OF TIME FOR A DURATION OF NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS. NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE EUTHANIZING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT.(3) THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A RELEASING AGENCY OF ITS CHOICE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(C) IMMUNITY.--AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY, INCLUDING THE FACILITY'S EMPLOYEES, FACULTY, STAFF, AGENTS, CONTRACTORS OR REPRESENTATIVES, SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY HARM, INJURY, PROPERTY DAMAGE OR OTHER DAMAGE OR LOSS CAUSED BY OR THAT OTHERWISE RESULTS FROM THE ADOPTION OF AN ANIMAL SUBJECT, NOR FOR ANY ILLNESS OR DISEASE OR PHYSICAL OR BEHAVIORAL CONDITION OF AN ANIMAL SUBJECT PLACED, IN GOOD FAITH, FOR ADOPTION IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.§ 58A05. Disclosure requirements.(a) Clear language.--A person that submits to a Commonwealth 20250SB0381PN1101 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency a proposal in response to a request for proposal or bid in response to an invitation for bids relating to a project or program that involves animal subjects and is to be financed by Commonwealth funds, shall clearly state in the proposal or bid:(1) The percentage of the total costs of the program or project to be financed with Commonwealth funds.(2) The dollar amount of Commonwealth funds for the project or program.(3) The percentage and dollar amount of the total costs of the project or program that will be financed by nongovernmental sources.(b) Disclosure in other records.--The duty in subsection (a) shall include a press release or other record of the person that identifies the project or program.(B) RECORD RETENTION.--ALL RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE MAINTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION, OR RELATED TO THE COURSE OF CONDUCT REGULATED BY THIS SECTION, SHALL BE RETAINED FOR A PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN TWO YEARS AND SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO AGENCY EMPLOYEES FOR INSPECTION.§ 58A06. Penalty.A person that has a duty under this subchapter and fails to comply with the duty may not receive Commonwealth funds for a period of one year from the date of the noncompliance.§ 58A07. Annual report by State Treasurer.(a) Duty of State Treasurer.--Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this section and each March 1 thereafter, the State Treasurer shall submit a report to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and shall post the report on the Treasury Department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report 20250SB0381PN1101 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall cover the prior calendar year. The report shall include the following information:(1) The total amount of Commonwealth funds expended to support animal research during the calendar year.(2) A list of active animal research projects for which Commonwealth funds were expended, including project titles, animal species, number of animals, calendar year cost, the total cost to date and the start and end date of the expenditure.(3) A list of the names and business addresses of the recipients of Commonwealth funding for the animal research projects.(b) Duty of Commonwealth agencies to cooperate.--The State Treasurer may request that a Commonwealth agency provide information deemed necessary by the State Treasurer to carry out the duty under subsection (a), and the Commonwealth agency shall cooperate with the State Treasurer by providing the information requested.§ 58A07. ANNUAL REPORTING ON COMMONWEALTH-FUNDED ANIMAL RESEARCH.(A) APPLICABILITY.--THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO ANY COMMONWEALTH AGENCY OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT PROVIDES OR AUTHORIZES THE EXPENDITURE OF COMMONWEALTH FUNDS FOR A PROJECT OR PROGRAM INVOLVING THE USE OF ANIMAL SUBJECTS.(B) REQUIRED DISCLOSURE.--ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR, EACH COMMONWEALTH AGENCY OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION, COVERING ACTIVITIES FROM THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR:(1) A DESCRIPTION OF EACH PROJECT OR PROGRAM INVOLVING 20250SB0381PN1101 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ANIMAL SUBJECTS THAT RECEIVED COMMONWEALTH FUNDS.(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF COMMONWEALTH FUNDS EXPENDED ON EACH PROJECT OR PROGRAM.(3) THE ANIMAL SPECIES AND ESTIMATED NUMBER OF ANIMALS USED, IF KNOWN OR AVAILABLE.(4) THE STATED RESEARCH PURPOSE OF THE PROJECT OR PROGRAM.(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (D).(C) RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT.--ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) COMPILE, SUMMARIZE AND ISSUE A REPORT BASED ON THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B).(2) TRANSMIT THE REPORT ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) TO THE:(I) PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE;(II) SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES;(III) CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE;(IV) CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES;(V) CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE AGRICULTURE AND RURAL AFFAIRS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE; AND(VI) CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE AGRICULTURE AND RURAL AFFAIRS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(3) POST THE REPORT ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT.20250SB0381PN1101 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) AUTHORITY OF THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT.--THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT MAY:(1) PRESCRIBE THE FORM AND FORMAT FOR SUBMISSION OF AGENCY AND INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION REPORTS; AND(2) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.(E) COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT.--FAILURE OF A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION MAY BE REFERRED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. FUTURE COMMONWEALTH FUNDING FOR NONCOMPLIANT RESEARCH PROJECTS MAY BE SUSPENDED BY LEGISLATIVE OR EXECUTIVE ACTION.§ 58A08. Annual report by recipients of Commonwealth funds.An institution of higher education , whether public or private, in this Commonwealth that is a recipient of Commonwealth funds and uses animal subjects or other animals in research shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website, not later than April 1, 2026, a written report on animal research conducted on the animal subjects and other animals during the course of the prior calendar year. The report shall be posted in a conspicuous and easily accessible manner so that the public can access a copy of the report electronically. The written report shall contain the following:(1) The total amount of money expended for animal research by the institution during the preceding calendar year, itemized by Federal, State, private and other revenue sources.(2) A list of active animal research projects, including project titles, the department of the institution conducting the research, species of animals, number of animals, calendar 20250SB0381PN1101 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year cost, total cost to date, funding source and the start and end date of the project.(3) A review of compliance with 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals), the United States Public Health Policy on Humane Care and Use of Laboratory Animals and other applicable Federal, State and local law, regulations and policies governing animal research. The review shall include an explanation of any animal research noncompliance documented during the preceding calendar year and corrective actions taken in each case.(4) (3) The number of animals by species adopted out from research laboratories during the preceding calendar year to animal shelters or to animal rescue organizations, and the number of animals euthanized by the institution.(5) Current roster for any institutional animal care and use committee within the institution.(6) (4) A detailed explanation of specific efforts by the institution to refine, reduce and replace the use of animals in research during the preceding calendar year. The explanation shall include the number of animals by species used in research each year for the past three calendar years and anticipated numbers in the next calendar year. The use of animals in research shall include animals used in scientific research, in testing and for experimentation purposes.SUBCHAPTER BSALESec.58A11. Scope of subchapter.58A12. Definitions.20250SB0381PN1101 - 11 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 58A13. Prohibition on sale of dogs and cats bred by certain persons.58A14. Duty of persons, kennels and animal testing facilities to offer dogs and cats for adoption.58A15. General powers of secretary.58A16. Recordkeeping requirements for persons and kennels engaged in the raising of dogs or cats for research purposes.58A17. Whistleblower protection.58A18. Annual report.58A19. Penalties (RESERVED) . 58A20. Regulations.§ 58A11. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the protection of dogs and cats.§ 58A12. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ANIMAL SUBJECT." A DOG OR A CAT."Animal testing facility." A facility, including a private entity, State agency or an institution of higher education, that confines HOUSES and uses dogs or cats for research, education, testing or other scientific or medical purposes. The term shall include any of the following:(1) A kennel or facility subject to the Public Health Service Policy on Humane Care and Use of Laboratory Animals provided for under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 6A (relating to public health service) . (2) A kennel or facility subject to the provisions of 21 CFR Pt. 58 (relating to good laboratory practice for 20250SB0381PN1101 - 12 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonclinical laboratory studies), 21 U.S.C. Ch. 9 (relating to Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act) or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 6A . (3) A research kennel licensed under the Dog law."Dealer." A person who in the regular course of business for compensation or profit buys, sells, transfers, exchanges or barters dogs and cats. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A person who transports companion animals in the regular course of business as a common carrier.(2) A person whose primary purpose is to find permanent adoptive homes for companion animals."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Dog Law." The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law."INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION." A STATE-OWNED UNIVERSITY, COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR STATE-RELATED INSTITUTION."Kennel." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Police officer." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Releasing agency." As defined in section 901-A of the Dog Law."Research." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Research kennel." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."State dog warden." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law.§ 58A13. Prohibition on sale of dogs and ca ts bred by certain persons . Notwithstanding the provisions of section 908 of the Dog Law, a dealer or kennel may not sell or offer for sale, including a sale for research purposes, a dog or cat bred by a person who 20250SB0381PN1101 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has received any of the following from the United States Department of Agriculture as authorized under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) or relevant regulations : (1) A citation for a direct or critical violation or citations for three or more indirect or noncritical violations during the two-year period before the procurement of the dog or cat.(2) Two consecutive citations for no access to a housing facility before the procurement of the dog or cat.§ 58A14. Duty of persons, kennels and animal testing facilities to offer dogs and cats for adoption.(a) Duties.--(1) If any person, kennel or animal testing facility specified under paragraph (2) does not have a need for a dog or cat in its possession and the dog or cat does not pose a health or safety risk to the public or the welfare of the dog or cat, the person, kennel or animal testing facility shall o ffer for release the dog or cat to a releasing agency for eventual adoption or for adoption through a private placement. In the case of an animal testing facility operated by a State agency or an institution of higher education, the animal testing facility may develop its own adoption program.(1) AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL, AFTER THE COMPLETION OF TESTING OR RESEARCH INVOLVING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE EUTHANASIA OF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT UPON THE TERMINATION OF THE STUDY, AS DEFINED AND APPROVED BY THE RESEARCH OF TESTING PROTOCOL, ASSESS THE HEALTH OF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION. THE ATTENDING VETERINARIAN OR DESIGNEE AT AN 20250SB0381PN1101 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL HAVE THE SOLE AUTHORITY TO ASSESS THE ANIMAL SUBJECT AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION.(2) IF THE ANIMAL SUBJECT IS DETERMINED TO BE SUITABLE FOR ADOPTION, THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SHALL OFFER THE ANIMAL SUBJECT FOR ADOPTION TO A RELEASING AGENCY OR THROUGH THE ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY'S ADOPTION PROGRAM TO A PRIVATE INDIVIDUAL.(2) (3) Paragraph (1) shall apply only to the following: (i) A person who raises cats regulated under Federal law as research animals or sells or transfers cats to an animal testing facility.(ii) A kennel that breeds dogs regulated under Federal law as research animals.(iii) A kennel that sells or transfers dogs to an animal testing facility or a research kennel.(iv) An animal testing facility.(3) Any person, kennel or animal testing facility subject to this subsection shall keep the offer for release under paragraph (1) available for a reasonable period of time for a duration of no less than 21 days before euthanizing a dog or cat specified under paragraph (1).(b) Implementation.--Any person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) may enter into an agreement with a releasing agency to implement the requirements under subsection (a).(c) Liability.--Any person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) shall not be liable for harm caused by or a defect suffered by a dog or cat placed, in good faith, for adoption in compliance with subsection (a).20250SB0381PN1101 - 15 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) PRIOR TO EUTHANIZING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT, ANY PERSON, KENNEL OR ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION SHALL KEEP THE OFFER FOR RELEASE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AVAILABLE FOR A REASONABLE PERIOD OF TIME FOR A DURATION OF NO LESS THAN 30 DAYS. NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE EUTHANIZING AN ANIMAL SUBJECT.(5) ANY PERSON, KENNEL OR ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A RELEASING AGENCY OF ITS CHOICE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(6) AN ANIMAL TESTING FACILITY, INCLUDING THE FACILITY'S EMPLOYEES, FACULTY, STAFF, AGENTS, CONTRACTORS AND REPRESENTATIVES, SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR HARM, INJURY, PROPERTY DAMAGE OR OTHER DAMAGE OR LOSS BY OR WHAT OTHERWISE RESULTS FROM THE ADOPTION OF AN ANIMAL SUBJECT, NOR FOR ANY ILLNESS OR DISEASE OR PHYSICAL OR BEHAVIORAL CONDITION OF AN ANIMAL SUBJECT PLACED, IN GOOD FAITH, FOR ADOPTION IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(d) (B) Annual reports.-- Any person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) shall annually submit a report to the department stating the number of dogs and cats that were adopted under subsection (a) and the name of each releasing agency utilized by the person, kennel or animal testing facility. § 58A15. General powers of secretary.In addition to the authority of the Secretary of Agriculture under section 211 of the Dog Law, the secretary shall revoke a kennel license, dealer license or out-of-State dealer license if a licensee is convicted of a violation of 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) or 18 U.S.C. § 48 (relating to animal crushing).20250SB0381PN1101 - 16 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 58A16. Recordkeeping requirements for persons and kennels engaged in the raising of dogs or cats for research purposes.(a) Requirements.--(1) A person or kennel specified under paragraph (2) and engaged in the raising of dogs or cats for research purposes shall keep accurate records of all of the following:(i) A dog or cat purchased, acquired, owned, held or otherwise in the possession or control of the person or kennel.(ii) A dog or cat transported, euthanized, sold or otherwise disposed of during the two-year period from the date of the purchase, acquisition, transfer or disposition of the dog or cat.(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only to the following:(i) A person who raises cats regulated under Federal law as research animals or sells or transfers cats to an animal testing facility.(ii) A kennel that breeds dogs regulated under Federal law as research animals.(iii) A kennel that sells or transfers dogs to an animal testing facility or a research kennel.(b) Records.-- THE RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE MAINTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE RETAINED FOR A PERIOD OF TWO YEARS AND SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION ONLY UPON PRESENTATION OF A VALID SEARCH WARRANT, COURT ORDER OR SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION. The records under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the person from whom a dog or cat was purchased or acquired and the person's license or 20250SB0381PN1101 - 17 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration number if the person is licensed or registered under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) . (2) The date on which a dog or cat was purchased or acquired.(3) The name and address of the person to whom a dog or cat was sold, given or transferred and the person's license or registration number if the person is licensed or registered under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 . (4) The official United States Department of Agriculture's tag number or tattoo assigned to a dog or cat under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 . (5) A description of a dog or cat, including all of the following:(i) The species and breed or type.(ii) The sex.(iii) The date of birth or approximate age.(iv) The color and distinctive markings.(6) The date and number of offspring born of a dog or cat while in the possession or under the control of the person or kennel under subsection (a) . (7) Medical care and vaccinations provided to a dog or cat.(8) The date and method of disposition of a dog or cat, including the sale, death and cause of death of the dog or cat if the disposition is not euthanasia, adoption or transfer.(9) The number of dogs or cats in the possession of the person or kennel under subsection (a) that the person or kennel does not need.20250SB0381PN1101 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) The number of dogs or cats described under paragraph (9) that have been offered for transfer to a releasing agency for eventual adoption or for adoption through private placement.(c) Inspections.--A person or kennel under subsection (a) shall ensure that the records under subsection (a) are legible and the records shall be open to inspection and may be copied by an employee of the department, State dog warden or police officer.(d) Submission.--A person or kennel under subsection (a) shall annually submit a summary of the records under subsection (a) to the department in a form determined by the department.(C) RECORD PRODUCTION.--A PERSON SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO PROSECUTION UNDER THIS SECTION SOLELY FOR DECLINING TO PRODUCE RECORDS OR DOCUMENTS UNLESS:(1) THE PRODUCTION WAS ORDERED PURSUANT TO A VALID SEARCH WARRANT, COURT ORDER OR SUBPOENA; AND(2) THE PERSON KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY FAILED TO COMPLY.§ 58A17. Whistleblower protection. An employee of any person, dealer, kennel, animal testing facility, private entity, State agency or institution of higher education subject to this subchapter shall be deemed to be an employee under the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this subchapter, the Dog Law or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) . Any dealer, kennel, animal testing facility, private entity, State agency or institution of higher education subject to this subchapter shall be deemed to be an employer under the Whistleblower Law with regard to a good faith 20250SB0381PN1101 - 19 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report of a potential violation of this subchapter, the Dog Law or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 . § 58A18. Annual report.No later than July 1, 2026 , and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report summarizing the information collected under this subchapter and complaints, enforcement activities and penalties authorized under this subchapter to the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 58A19. Penalties. A violation of this subchapter shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree. (RESERVED). § 58A20. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this subchapter.SUBCHAPTER CCERTAIN TESTING PROHIBITEDSec.58A31. Definitions.58A32. Certain test methods prohibited.58A33. Report.58A34. Remedy.§ 58A31. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alternative test method or strategy." A test method, 20250SB0381PN1101 - 20 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including a new or revised method, that:(1) does not use animals;(2) provides information of equivalent or better scientific quality and relevance compared to traditional animal test methods; and(3) includes, but is not limited to, computational toxicology and bioinformatics, high-throughput screening methods, testing of categories of chemical substances, tiered testing methods, in vitro studies and microphysiological systems."Animal." Any live vertebrate other than humans."Biomedical research." The investigation of the biological processes and causes of disease or research conducted to increase fundamental scientific knowledge or to expand the understanding about how processes in living organisms develop and function. The term shall not include testing conducted to assess the safety or efficacy of chemicals, ingredients, drugs, vaccines, product formulations or products."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION." A STATE-OWNED UNIVERSITY, COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR STATE-RELATED INSTITUTION."Product testing facility." Any entity, institution, business, partnership, corporation, association or other legal relationship that tests chemicals, ingredients, drugs, vaccines, product formulations or products in this Commonwealth."Traditional animal test method." A process, procedure or experiment using animals to obtain information on the characteristics of a chemical, ingredient, drug, vaccine, product formulation or product and that generates information 20250SB0381PN1101 - 21 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regarding the ability of the chemical, ingredient, drug, vaccine, product formulation or product to produce a specific biological effect under specified conditions.§ 58A32. Certain test methods prohibited. (a) Prohibition.--It is unlawful for a product testing facility to use a traditional animal test method in the Commonwealth if an agency responsible for regulating the specific product or activity for which the test method is being used has either:(1) approved an alternative test method or strategy; or(2) made available or granted a waiver from the use of a traditional animal test method.(b) Alternative.--If no alternative test method or strategy and no waiver is available under subsection (a), a product testing facility shall use a traditional animal test method using the fewest number of animals possible and reduce the level of pain, suffering and stress of an animal used for testing.(c) Application.--No provision of this section shall be construed to:(1) apply to any animal research conducted for the purposes of biomedical research;(2) prohibit the use of any non-animal test method or strategy for the testing of any chemical, ingredient, drug, vaccine, product formulation or product that is not described in the definition of "alternative test method or strategy";(3) prohibit the use of traditional animal test methods to comply with requirements of Federal or State agencies; or (4) prohibit the use of traditional animal test methods if needed to comply with a written request from a Federal or State agency in circumstances where the agency has approved 20250SB0381PN1101 - 22 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an alternative test method or strategy but also expressly concluded that a traditional animal test method is needed to fully assess the impacts on the health or safety of consumers . ; (5) PROHIBIT THE USE OF TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS COMMENCED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE METHODS ARE EMPLOYED SOLELY FOR THE COMPLETION OF THE SPECIFIC RESEARCH PROJECT; OR(6) PROHIBIT THE USE OF A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD THAT WAS INITIATED PRIOR TO AGENCY APPROVAL OF AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD OR STRATEGY, IF THE TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD IS EMPLOYED SOLELY FOR THE COMPLETION OF THE SPECIFIC TEST.§ 58A33. Report. Each product testing facility in this Commonwealth shall annually submit a report to the department by June 30, 2026, and each June 30 thereafter, regarding any traditional animal test method or alternative test method or strategy conducted in the prior calendar year. The report under this section shall be posted on each product testing facility's publicly accessible Internet website no later than 90 days following the submission of the report under this section to the department. The report shall include:(1) The number and species of animals used.(2) The type and number of alternative test methods or strategies used.(3) The number of waivers used.(4) The reason for using any traditional animal test methods, alternative test methods or strategies or waivers, including an explanation for why a traditional animal test 20250SB0381PN1101 - 23 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 method was required.§ 58A34. Remedy.Upon a violation of this subchapter or any rules, regulations or orders issued under this subchapter, the Attorney General may institute a civil action in Commonwealth Court or in the court of common pleas of the judicial district in which the violation occurs for injunctive relief to restrain the violation and for such other relief as the court shall deem proper. Neither the institution of this action nor any of the proceedings therein shall relieve any party to the proceedings from other fines or penalties prescribed for the violation of this subchapter or any rule.(A) CIVIL ACTION.--UPON A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBCHAPTER OR ANY RULE, REGULATION OR ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INSTITUTE A CIVIL ACTION IN COMMONWEALTH COURT OR IN THE COURT OF COMMON PLEAS OF THE JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURRED FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO RESTRAIN THE VIOLATION AND FOR OTHER RELIEF AS THE COURT SHALL DEEM PROPER. NEITHER THE INSTITUTION OF THIS ACTION NOR ANY PROCEEDING RELATED TO THE ACTION SHALL RELIEVE ANY PARTY TO THE PROCEEDINGS FROM OTHER FINES OR PENALTIES PRESCRIBED FOR THE VIOLATION OF THIS SUBCHAPTER OR ANY RULE, REGULATION OR ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER.(B) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO:(1) PROVIDE A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION TO ANY PERSON TO ENFORCE ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBCHAPTER; OR(2) CREATE A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE INSTITUTION FOR ANY CIVIL LIABILITY.20250SB0381PN1101 - 24 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0381PN1101 - 25 - <--1